Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-269
Long-term suspension, expulsion, or mandatory reassignment; hearing; procedure; hearing examiner; how designated; examination of records.

(1) If a hearing is requested within five school days after receipt of the notice as provided in section 79-268, the superintendent shall appoint a hearing examiner who shall, within two school days after being appointed, give written notice to the principal, the student, and the student's parent or guardian of the time and place for the hearing.

(2) The hearing examiner shall be any person designated by the school district's superintendent, school board or board of education, or counsel, if such person (a) has not brought the charges against the student, (b) shall not be a witness at the hearing, and (c) has no involvement in the charge.

(3) The hearing shall be scheduled within a period of five school days after it is requested, but such time may be changed by the hearing examiner for good cause. No hearing shall be held upon less than two school days' actual notice to the principal, the student, and the student's parent or guardian, except with the consent of all the parties.

(4) The principal or legal counsel for the school, the student, and the student's parent, guardian, or representative have the right to examine the records and written statements referred to in the Student Discipline Act as well as the statement of any witness in the possession of the school board or board of education at a reasonable time prior to the hearing.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 13;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 19;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,182;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 73.